Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3020.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8.9 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance — Long-
Term Care Service and Finance Reform" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following
section:
40-8.9-10. Assisted living community Medicaid rates -- Annual cost-of-living
adjustment.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the executive office of health and
human services (EOHHS) shall apply an automatic cost-of-living adjustment (“COLA”) to the
Medicaid reimbursement rates paid for assisted living services provided pursuant to this chapter.
(b) The annual COLA shall be equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), Northeast Region for the most recently completed
calendar year, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(c) The COLA adjustment shall be applied uniformly across all Medicaid-assisted living
rate tiers including, but not limited to, acuity-based or service-level rate categories.
(d) The COLA required under this section shall be applied automatically and shall not be
subject to annual appropriation approval, rate rebasing, or discretionary adjustment by the
executive branch, except as otherwise expressly provided by law.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the general assembly from
authorizing additional rate increases or rate restructuring beyond the COLA provided in this

section.
(f) The EOHHS shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement this
section, including alignment with federal Medicaid requirements and state plan amendments, if
required.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to Medicaid assisted
living rates effective July 1, 2026.
========
LC005203
========
LC005203 - Page 2 of 3